Washington statutes.
RCW 2.04.030

Supreme court and court of appeals—When open.

The supreme court and the court of appeals shall always be open for the transaction of business except on Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays designated by the legislature.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 107 s 1; 1909 p 36 s 7; RRS s 4. Prior: 1890 p 322 s 4, part.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: SAR-Rule 4.

Legal holidays: RCW 1.16.050.